California, session 20252026, AB2250.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 22980.6 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:22980.6. (a) A person that is engaged in the business of selling cigarettes or tobacco products in this state shall not possess, store, own, or make a retail sale of cannabis, cannabis products, or a product presumed to be a cannabis product pursuant to subdivision (b), or any regulations promulgated pursuant to that chapter, at any site where cigarettes or tobacco products are stored or sold. A person that violates this subdivision is subject to civil penalties and suspension or revocation of their license pursuant to subdivision (d).(b) For purposes of this section, it shall be presumed that a product that contains or purports to contain a cannabinoid, including a synthetic cannabinoid, is a cannabis product, regardless of the nature or source of the cannabinoid. This presumption may be rebutted by evidence showing that the product does either of the following:(1) Complies with Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 111920) of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code and any regulations promulgated pursuant to that chapter.(2) Meets the definition of industrial hemp, as that term is defined in Section 11018.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(c) (1) In addition to the authority provided pursuant to Section 34016 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, upon discovery by the department that any person possesses, stores, owns, or has made a retail sale of cannabis or cannabis products in violation of this section, the department is authorized to seize such products at the person’s location. Any cannabis or cannabis products seized by the department pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed forfeited and the department shall comply with the procedures set forth in Sections 30436 to 30449, inclusive, of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(2) Any seizures or penalties authorized pursuant to this section are in addition to any criminal or civil penalties that may be imposed by law.(d) (1) (A) A first violation of subdivision (a) involving the seizure of cannabis or cannabis products shall be punishable as follows:(i) Cannabis or cannabis products with an aggregate retail value of less than two hundred dollars ($200) shall be punishable by a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000).(ii) Cannabis or cannabis product with an aggregate retail value of two hundred dollars ($200) or more shall be punishable by a civil penalty of two thousand dollars ($2,000).(B) A second violation of subdivision (a) within five years involving a seizure of cannabis or cannabis products shall be punishable as follows:(i) Cannabis or cannabis products with an aggregate retail value of less than two hundred dollars ($200) shall be punishable by a civil penalty of two thousand dollars ($2,000) and shall also result in a five-day suspension of the license.(ii) Cannabis or cannabis product with an aggregate retail value of two hundred dollars ($200) or more shall be punishable by a civil penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000) and shall result in a 10-day suspension of the license.(C) A third violation of subdivision (a) within five years involving a seizure of cannabis or cannabis products shall be punishable as follows:(i) Cannabis or cannabis products with an aggregate retail value of less than two hundred dollars ($200) shall be punishable by a civil penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000) and shall also result in a revocation of the license.(ii) Cannabis or cannabis products with an aggregate retail value of two hundred dollars ($200) or more shall be punishable by a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and shall result in a revocation of the license.(2) The department shall ascertain as best it may the retail value based on any information within the department’s possession or that may come into its possession of the cannabis or cannabis product.(3) The department shall issue the civil penalty in accordance with the procedures applicable to the civil penalty authorized under Section 22974.7.(4) The department shall revoke or suspend the license of a person who violates subdivision (a) in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 22980.3.(e) For purposes of this section:(1) “Cannabis” and “cannabis products” shall have the same meaning as provided in Part 14.5 (commencing with Section 34010) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. Section 11018 of the Health and Safety Code.(2) “Cannabis products” shall have the same meaning as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 11018.1 of the Health and Safety Code. (2)(3) “Cannabinoid” and “synthetic cannabinoid” shall have the same meaning as provided in Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000).(f) Civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Compliance Fund created pursuant to Section 22990.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 22990 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:22990. (a) All moneys collected pursuant to this division shall be deposited in the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Compliance Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. No moneys in the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Compliance Fund shall be used to supplant state or local General Fund money for any purpose.(b) All moneys in the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Compliance Fund are available for expenditure, upon appropriation by the Legislature, solely for the purpose of implementing, enforcing, and administering the California Cigarette and Tobacco Products Licensing Act of 2003, this division, including the seizure and destruction of cigarettes, tobacco products, cannabis, cannabis products, and products presumed to be cannabis. any product seized pursuant to this division.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. Section 11006.5 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:11006.5. (a) Before January 1, 2026, “concentrated cannabis” means the separated resin, whether crude or purified, obtained from cannabis.(b) Beginning on January 1, 2026, and until January 1, 2028, “concentrated cannabis” or “cannabis concentrate” means cannabis that has undergone a process to concentrate one or more active cannabinoids, thereby increasing potency, and includes extracts, oils, hash, dab, shatter, rosin, wax, and the separated resin, whether crude or purified.(c) Beginning on January 1, 2028, the following apply:(1) “Concentrated cannabis” or “cannabis concentrate” means cannabis or industrial hemp that has undergone a process to concentrate one or more active cannabinoids, thereby increasing potency, and includes extracts, oils, hash, dab, shatter, rosin, wax, and the separated resin, whether crude or purified.(2) “Cannabis concentrate” does not include CBD isolate or CBN isolate, as defined in Section 26001 of the Business and Professions Code.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. Section 34010 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:34010. (a) This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Cannabis Tax Law.”(b) For purposes of this part:(1) “2020–21 fiscal year baseline” means the total amount of funds disbursed in the sub-trust accounts in fiscal year 2021–22 for the third allocation of the fiscal year 2020–21 revenue, pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 34019, as determined by the Department of Finance.(2) “Arm’s length transaction” shall mean a sale entered into in good faith and for valuable consideration that reflects the fair market value in the open market between two informed and willing parties, neither under any compulsion to participate in the transaction.(3) “Average market price” shall mean both of the following:(A) (i) In an arm’s length transaction, the average retail price determined by the wholesale cost of the cannabis or cannabis products sold or transferred to a cannabis retailer, plus a mark-up, as determined by the department on a biannual basis in six-month intervals on or before July 1, 2022.(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), the department shall not increase the mark-up amount during the period beginning on and after the operative date of the act amending this section by adding this clause and before July 1, 2021.(B) In a nonarm’s length transaction, the cannabis retailer’s gross receipts from the retail sale of the cannabis or cannabis products.(4) “Cannabis” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 11018 of the Health and Safety Code and shall also mean medicinal cannabis.(5) “Cannabis products” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 11018.1 of the Health and Safety Code and shall also mean medicinal concentrates and medicinal cannabis products.(6) “Cannabis flowers” means the dried flowers of the cannabis plant as defined by the department.(7) “Cannabis leaves” means all parts of the cannabis plant other than cannabis flowers that are sold or consumed.(8) “Cannabis retailer” means a person required to be licensed pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code as a retailer, non-storefront retailer, microbusiness, or nonprofit, or any other person otherwise authorized under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code to engage in retail sales.(9) “Cultivator” means all persons required to be licensed to cultivate cannabis pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code.(10) “Department” means the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration or its successor agency.(11) “Designated for donation” means medicinal cannabis donated by a cultivator to a cannabis retailer for subsequent donation to a medicinal cannabis patient pursuant to Section 26071 of the Business and Professions Code.(12) “Distributor” means a person required to be licensed as a distributor pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code.(13) “Enters the commercial market” means cannabis or cannabis products, except for immature cannabis plants and seeds, that complete and comply with a quality assurance review and testing, as described in Section 26110 of the Business and Professions Code.(14) “Gross receipts” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 6012.(15) “Manufacturer” means a person required to be licensed as a manufacturer pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code.(16) “Medicinal cannabis patient” means a qualified patient, as defined in Section 11362.7 of the Health and Safety Code, who possesses a physician’s recommendation that complies with Article 25 (commencing with Section 2525) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or a qualified patient or primary caregiver for a qualified patient issued a valid identification card pursuant to Section 11362.71 of the Health and Safety Code.(17) “Microbusiness” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 26001 of the Business and Professions Code.(18) “Nonprofit” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 26070.5 of the Business and Professions Code.(19) “Person” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 6005.(20) “Retail sale” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 6007.(21) “Sale” and “purchase” mean any change of title or possession, exchange, or barter, conditional or otherwise, in any manner or by any means whatsoever, for consideration.(22) “Sub-trust accounts” means the sub-trust accounts created under subdivision (f) of Section 34019. (23) “Tax fund” means the California Cannabis Tax Fund created by Section 34018.(24) “Transfer” means to grant, convey, hand over, assign, sell, exchange, or barter, in any manner or by any means, with or without consideration.(25) “Unprocessed cannabis” includes cannabis flowers, cannabis leaves, or other categories of harvested cannabis, categories for unprocessed or frozen cannabis or immature plants, or cannabis that is shipped directly to manufacturers.SEC. 5. Section 34016 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:34016. (a) Any peace officer or department employee granted limited peace officer status pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 830.11 of the Penal Code, upon presenting appropriate credentials, is authorized to enter any place as described in paragraph (2) and to conduct inspections in accordance with the following paragraphs, inclusive.(1) Inspections shall be performed in a reasonable manner and at times that are reasonable under the circumstances, taking into consideration the normal business hours of the place to be entered.(2) Inspections may be at any place at which cannabis or cannabis products are sold to purchasers, cultivated, or stored, at any site where evidence of activities involving evasion of tax may be discovered, or at any place where any package, label, advertisement, or other document or object of any kind bearing the universal symbol as described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 26130 of the Business and Professions Code and any applicable regulations, are sold or stored in violation of Section 26031.6 of the Business and Professions Code.(3) Inspections shall be conducted no more than once in a 24-hour period.(b) Any person who fails or refuses to allow an inspection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Each offense shall be punished by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisonment not exceeding one year in a county jail, or both the fine and imprisonment. The court shall order any fines assessed be deposited in the California Cannabis Tax Fund.(c) (1) (A) The department or a law enforcement agency may seize cannabis or cannabis products from a person who possesses, stores, owns, or has made a retail sale of those cannabis or cannabis products if any of the following apply:(i) Until January 1, 2023, the cannabis or cannabis products are without evidence of tax payment.(ii) The cannabis or cannabis products are not contained in secure packaging.(iii) The person is an unlicensed person specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 34015.1.(iv) The cannabis or cannabis product is possessed, stored, offered for sale, or sold at an unlicensed premises. (iv)(v) The cannabis or cannabis products were not reported in the track and trace system, as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 34015.1.(v)The product is presumed to be a cannabis product as provided in subparagraph (B) and is possessed, stored, offered for sale, or sold by an unlicensed person or at an unlicensed premises.(B) (i)For purposes of this section, it shall be presumed that a product that contains or purports to contain a cannabinoid, including a synthetic cannabinoid, is a cannabis product, regardless of the nature or source of the cannabinoid.(ii) cannabinoid. This presumption may be rebutted by evidence showing that the product complies with Chapter either of the following:(i) Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 111920) of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, and any regulations promulgated pursuant to that chapter or meets chapter.(ii) Meets the definition of industrial hemp, as that term is defined in Section 11018.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(C) The department may seize any package, label, advertisement, or other document or object of any kind bearing the universal symbol or bearing any likeness or simulation of the universal symbol in violation of Section 26031.6 of the Business and Professions Code. Any package, label, advertisement, or other document or object seized by the department pursuant to this paragraph shall be deemed forfeited and the department shall comply with the procedures set forth in Sections 30436 to 30449, inclusive.(D) Any cannabis or cannabis products seized by a law enforcement agency or the department shall be deemed forfeited and the department shall comply with the procedures set forth in Sections 30436 through 30449, inclusive.(2) Any seizures authorized pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subdivision are in addition to any criminal or civil penalties that may be imposed by law, including subdivision (e) of this section.(3) For purposes of this section, “cannabinoid” and “synthetic cannabinoid” shall have the same meaning as provided in Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code.(d) Any person who renders a false or fraudulent report is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.(e) Any violation of any provisions of this part, except as otherwise provided, is a misdemeanor and is punishable as such.(f) All moneys remitted to the department under this part shall be credited to the California Cannabis Tax Fund.SEC. 6. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.